Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.092

Transfer of cadet service credit to Washington state patrol retirement system.

(1) Active members of the Washington state patrol retirement system who have previously established service credit in the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 or plan 2 while employed by the state patrol as a cadet as defined in *RCW 43.43.120(6)(b) may have such service credit transferred to the state patrol retirement system subject to the terms and conditions specified in chapter 43.43 RCW, including reestablishment of such service for the sole purpose of transfer. Service reestablishment shall be subject to the interest requirements of RCW 41.40.150(2).

(2) Service credit established for employment other than that specified in subsection (1) of this section is not eligible for transfer.

[ 2000 c 247 s 108; 1983 c 81 s 3. Formerly RCW 41.40.530.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.43.120 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (6)(b) to subsection (5)(b).

Effective date—1983 c 81: See note following RCW 43.43.120.